lexd_components/hyw-ambiguousPOS.lexd
################################
#### Lexicon of non-verbs which are tagged with multiple POSes from Kouyoumdjian's dictionary "A comprehensive dictionary Armenian-English"

LEXICON AdvNounReg
երեքօրեայ:երեքօրեայ
հետի:հետի
օսմաներէն:օսմաներէն
հետիոտն:հետիոտն
